North Carolina statutes. Chapter 55A. North Carolina Nonprofit Corporation Act.
Part 3. Secretary of State.

§ 55A-1-30.
Powers.

The Secretary of State has the power reasonably necessary to perform the duties required of the Secretary of State by this Chapter.

History.

1955, c. 1230; 1993, c. 398, s. 1.

§ 55A-1-31.
Interrogatories by Secretary of State.

The Secretary of State may propound to any domestic or foreign corporation which the Secretary of State has reason to believe is subject to the provisions of this Chapter, and to any officer or director thereof, any written interrogatories as may be reasonably necessary and proper to enable the Secretary of State to ascertain whether the corporation is subject to the provisions of this Chapter or has complied with all the provisions of this Chapter applicable to it. The interrogatories shall be answered within 30 days after the mailing thereof, or within such additional time as shall be fixed by the Secretary of State, and the answers thereto shall be full and complete and shall be made in writing and under oath. If the interrogatories are directed to an individual, they shall be answered by the individual, and if directed to a corporation, they shall be answered by the presiding officer of the board of directors, the president, or by another officer of the corporation. The Secretary of State shall certify to the Attorney General, for such action as the Attorney General may deem appropriate, all interrogatories and answers thereto which disclose a violation of any of the provisions of this Chapter, requiring or permitting action by the Attorney General.

History.

1955, c. 1230; 1993, c. 398, s. 1.

North Carolina Commentary

This section brings forward former G.S. 55A-79 with minor modifications.

§ 55A-1-32.
Penalties imposed upon corporations, officers, and directors for failure to answer interrogatories.

The knowing failure or refusal of a domestic or foreign corporation to answer truthfully and fully, within the time prescribed in this Chapter, interrogatories propounded by the Secretary of State in accordance with the provisions of this Chapter shall constitute grounds for administrative dissolution under

G.S. 55A-14-20

or for revocation under

G.S. 55A-15-30

, as the case may be.

Each officer and director of a domestic or foreign corporation who knowingly fails or refuses, within the time prescribed by this Chapter, to answer truthfully and fully interrogatories propounded to him by the Secretary of State in accordance with the provisions of this Chapter shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

1955, c. 1230; 1993, c. 398, s. 1; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 14, s. 37.

North Carolina Commentary

This section brings forward former G.S. 55A-80 with two exceptions: First, a violation of this section by a corporation is not a misdemeanor; instead, the Secretary of State is empowered to dissolve administratively an offending domestic corporation under Article 14 and to revoke the certificate of authority of an offending foreign corporation under Article 15. Second, the provisions relating to the signing of false documents by a director or officer were omitted and are covered by

G.S. 55A-1-29

.

§ 55A-1-33.
Information disclosed by interrogatories.

Interrogatories propounded by the Secretary of State and the answers thereto shall not be open to public inspection nor shall the Secretary of State disclose any facts or information obtained therefrom except when the Secretary of State’s official duty requires disclosure to be made public or when the interrogatories or the answers thereto are required for evidence in any criminal proceeding or in any other action or proceeding by this State.

History.

1993, c. 398, s. 1.

North Carolina Commentary

This section had no counterpart in the prior law.

§§ 55A-1-34 through 55A-1-39.

Reserved for future codification purposes.